Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5836.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to designate January 30 of each year as Fred Korematsu Day, March 31 of each year as Cesar E. Chavez Day, July 14 of each year as President Gerald R. Ford Day, and July 30 of each year as Henry Ford Day. Enacting section 1. Section 1 of 2003 PA 225, MCL 435.301, is repealed.